Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.01
Definitions.

For purposes of sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13:

(1) Application means a request under the Convention by an obligee or obligor, or on behalf of a child, made through a central authority for assistance from another central authority.

(2) Central authority means the entity designated by the United States or a foreign country described in subdivision (5)(D) of section 42-702 to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

(3) Convention support order means a support order of a tribunal of a foreign country described in subdivision (5)(D) of section 42-702.

(4) Direct request means a petition filed by an individual in a tribunal of this state in a proceeding involving an obligee, an obligor, or a child residing outside the United States.

(5) Foreign central authority means the entity designated by a foreign country described in subdivision (5)(D) of section 42-702 to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

(6) Foreign support agreement:

(A) means an agreement for support in a record that:

(i) is enforceable as a support order in the country of origin;

(ii) has been:

(I) formally drawn up or registered as an authentic instrument by a foreign tribunal; or

(II) authenticated by, or concluded, registered, or filed with a foreign tribunal; and

(iii) may be reviewed and modified by a foreign tribunal; and

(B) includes a maintenance arrangement or authentic instrument under the Convention.

(7) United States central authority means the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 48.